src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_KUVITELLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuvitella:kuvittel
:%{back%} V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE ;

LEXICON V_EZITELLAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** ezitellä:ezittel
:%{front%} V-VV_KUVITELLA/EZITELLAE ;

LEXICON V_ULISTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** ulista:ulis
:%{back%} V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr ;

LEXICON V_PAISTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** paista:pagis
:%{back%} V_PAISTA_01 ;
LEXICON V_PAISTA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** paista:pagis

!: V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_VOWEL-STEM ;
!: V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_CONSONANT-STEM ;

+Act:%^VOICE%>e INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act:%^VOICE%>e INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act:%^VOICE%>o INDPRSSG3_BACK ; ! pagizou
+Act:%^VOICE%>e INDPRSPL1_BACK ;
+Act:%^VOICE%>e INDPRSPL2_BACK ;
+Act:%^Pen%^WGStem%> INDPRSPL3_tah ; ! paistah
+Act:%^VOICE%>e INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
! MORE WORK NEEDED 2015-11
+Act:%^VOICE INDPRTSG1     ;
+Act:%^VOICE INDPRTSG2     ;
+Act:%^VOICE INDPRTSG3     ;
+Act:%^VOICE INDPRTPL1_BACK     ;
+Act:%^VOICE INDPRTPL2_BACK     ;
+Act:%^Pen%^WGStem%> INDPRTPL3_tih     ; ! paistih
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nuh ; 
+Act:%^Pen%^WGStem INDPRTCONNEGPL3_tu ; ! paistu

+Act:%^VOICE CONDPRS_IS_BACK ;
+Act:%^Pen%^%^WGStem CONDPRSPL3_tas ; ! paistas
+Act: CONDPRT_nus ; ! paistanus
+Act:%^Pen%^%^WGStem CONDPRTPL3_tannus ; ! paistannus
+Act: POT_N_BACK ;
+Act:%^Pen%^%^WGStem POTPL3_tanneh ; ! paistanneh
+Act: IMPRT_Ga ;
+Act:%^Pen%^%^WGStem IMPRTPL3_tahes ; ! paistahes

:%^VOICEi ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
:%^Pen%^%^WGStem ACT-PRFPRC_nuH ; ! paissuh
:%^Pen%^%^WGStem PSS-PRSPRC_tavu ; ! paistavu
:%^Pen%^%^WGStem PSS-PRFPRC_tu ;  ! paistu
:%^VOICEe M-INF_BACK ; ! pagizemas/pagizemah/pagizemal/pagizemattah...
+Inf:%>d%{aä%}%^WGStem K ;
+Ger+Temp:%^Pen%^%^WGStem%>te K ;

!LEXICON V_SUVATA !!≈ * **@CODE@** suvata:suva
!:%{back%} V-VV_04_BACK ;

!LEXICON V_SUATA !!≈ * **@CODE@** suata:suva (suvaiččov)
!:%{back%} V_SUATA_01 ;
!LEXICON V_SUATA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** suata:suva (suvaiččov)
!+Act: #;

LEXICON VR_AMBUO !!≈ * **@CODE@** ambuokseh:ambu
:%{back%} VR_AMBUO_01 ;
LEXICON VR_AMBUO_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ambuokseh:ambu
! gradation: yes
:     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;  ! ammuttos
:     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-BACK-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-BACK-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
+Inf+Rfl:%>%{oö%}kseh K ;

LEXICON VR_VALUO !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuokseh:valu
! harmony: back
:%{back%} VR_VALUO/PYZYÖ ;
LEXICON VR_VALUO/PYZYÖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuokseh:valu
! gradation: no
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;  
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
INF-RC_Akseh ;

LEXICON VR_PYZYÖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuokseh:valu
! harmony: front
:%{front%} VR_VALUO/PYZYÖ ;

LEXICON VR_PUNUO !!≈ * **@CODE@** punuokseh:puno
:%{back%} VR_PUNUO/XX_01 ;
LEXICON VR_PUNUO/XX_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** punuokseh:puno
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;  
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
INF-RC_Akseh ;

LEXICON VR_IMIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** imiekseh:ime
:%{front%} VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ; ! FIXME  

!LEXICON VR_EČČIE !!≈ * __@CODE@__ eččiekseh:ečči
!:%{front%} VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ; 
LEXICON VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** imiekseh:ime
:     VR_01-FRONT-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:     VR_01-FRONT-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;  
:%^RmVow     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-FRONT-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:     VR_01-FRONT-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
INF-RC_Akseh ;

LEXICON VR_POTKIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** potkiekseh:potki
:%{back%} VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ; 


LEXICON VR_PIDIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pidiäkseh:pidä
:%{front%} VR_PIDIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON VR_PIDIÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** pidiäkseh:pidä
:     VR_01-FRONT-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-FRONT-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;  
:%^RmVow     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-FRONT-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-FRONT-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
+Inf+Rfl:%^Ä2I%>%{aä%}kseh K ;

LEXICON VR_KANDUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kanduakseh:kanda
:%{back%} VR_KANDUA_01 ;
LEXICON VR_KANDUA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** kanduakseh:kanda
:     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK ;  
:%^WGStem%^A2O     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:%^A2O     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-BACK-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-BACK-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
+Inf+Rfl:%^A2U%>%{aä%}kseh K ;

LEXICON VR_KANDUA-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** kanduakseh:kanda
:%{back%} VR_KANDUA-SG3_01 ;
LEXICON VR_KANDUA-SG3_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** kanduakseh:kanda
:     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;  ! +Cond+Prs
:%^WGStem     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK ;  ! Ind+Prs+Sg1
:%^WGStem%^A2O     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;  ! Ind+Prt+Sg1
:%^A2O     VR_01-BACK-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-BACK-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;  ! Pot
:%^WGStem     VR_01-BACK-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;  ! Ind+Prs+Pl3

LEXICON VR_OTTUA-SG3 ! needs fixing 2016-08-17
VR_OTTUA ;
LEXICON VR_OTTUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** ottuakseh:otta
:%{back%} VR_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON VR_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ottuakseh:otta
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK ;  
:%^WGStem%^RmVow     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:%^RmVow     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
INF-RC_Akseh ;

LEXICON VR_LIIKUTTUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kirjuttuakseh:kirjutta
:%{back%} VR_LIIKUTTUA/XX_01 ;
LEXICON VR_LIIKUTTUA/XX_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** kirjuttuakseh:kirjutta
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK ;  
:%^WGStem%^RmVow     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:%^RmVow     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:%^WGStem     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
INF-RC_Akseh ;

!LEXICON VR_EISTIÄ-SG3 ! needs fixing 2016-08-17
!VR_EISTIÄ ;
LEXICON VR_EISTIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** eistiäkseh:eistä
:%{front%} VR_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 ;


!! Reflexive verbs

LEXICON VR_RODIEKSEH !!≈ * **@CODE@** rodiekseh:rodi
! Gradation: Yes
:%{back%} VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ; 


LEXICON VR_ROIJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** roijakseh:roi
:%{back%}        VR_ ;

!LEXICON VR_VOIJA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ voijakseh:voi
!        VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_ROITA !!≈ * **@CODE@** roita:roi 
:%{back%}        VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_JUVVA !!≈ * **@CODE@** juvva:jo
:%{back%}	VR_	 ;
LEXICON VR_MYVVÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** myvvä:mö
:%{front%}	VR_	 ;

LEXICON VR_NÄHTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** nähtä:nä
:%{front%}i	VR-LONGSTEM_ ;
:%{front%}	VR-SHORTSTEM_ ;


LEXICON VR_TULLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** tuliekseh:tul !this will need work 2013-10-23
:%{back%}	VR_03 ;

LEXICON VR_PESTÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** tuliekseh:tul !this will need work 2013-10-23
:%{front%}	VR_03 ;

LEXICON VR_KUVITELLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuvitellakseh:kuvittel !this will need work 2016-08-17
:%{back%}	VR_03_KUVITELLAKSEH ;

LEXICON VR_EBAEILLAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** kuvitellakseh:kuvittel !this will need work 2016-08-17
:%{front%}	VR_03_KUVITELLAKSEH ;

LEXICON VR_AVATA !!≈ * **@CODE@** avatakseh:ava (typätäkseh:typpä)
:%{back%} VR_ ;

LEXICON VR_SUVAIJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** suvaijakseh:suvai
!Verbs of the Finnish type 5
:%{back%}čče VR-LONGSTEM_ ;
:%{back%} VR-SHORTSTEM_ ;

LEXICON VR_EMÄNDÖIJÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** emändöijäkseh:emändöi
!Verbs of the Finnish type 5
:%{front%}čče VR-LONGSTEM_ ;
:%{front%} VR-SHORTSTEM_ ;

!LEXICON VR_MERKITÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ merkitäkseh:merki
!!Verbs of the Finnish type 5
!:čče VR-LONGSTEM_ ;
! VR-SHORTSTEM_ ;
